Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8406
Provider; immunity.

A provider who transfers or submits information in good faith to a patient's medical record shall not be liable in damages to the patient or any other person for the disclosure of such medical records as provided in sections 71-8401 to 71-8407.

Laws 1999, LB 17, § 6.